New York, session 2025-2026, A10598.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 115 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 115. Underrepresented educators convention. 1. For purposes of this 4 section, "underrepresented educators" shall mean teachers or administra- 5 tors who currently participate or previously participated in a school 6 district or post-secondary partnership as part of a Grow Your Own initi- 7 ative, My Brother's Keeper, teacher opportunity corps program, higher 8 education opportunity program, education opportunity program, or any 9 other similar program or initiative. 10 2. (a) The commissioner shall annually convene a statewide convention 11 to bring together underrepresented educators to discuss experiences, 12 best practices, and afford for networking, mentorship opportunities, and 13 support. Such convention shall occur at a time and location chosen by 14 the commissioner. 15 (b) The commissioner shall also provide for at least five regional 16 conventions annually to bring together underrepresented educators within 17 each geographic region of the state to discuss experiences, best prac- 18 tices, and afford for networking, mentorship opportunities, and support. 19 Such conventions shall occur at a time and location chosen by the 20 commissioner. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03796-01-5